Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SHORT TITLE
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS  166.262, 166.370 and
166.377 by sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act  shall be known and may be cited as the “Commu-
nity Safety Firearms Act.”
RAPID FIRE ACTIVATORS
SECTION 2. (1) A person commits the  crime of unlawful transport, manufacture or
transfer of a rapid fire activator if the person knowingly:
(a) Transports a rapid fire activator into this state; or
(b) Manufactures, sells, offers to sell or transfers a rapid fire activator.
(2) A person commits the  crime of unlawful possession of a rapid fire activator if the
person knowingly possesses, purchases or receives a rapid fire activator.
(3)(a) Unlawful transport, manufacture or transfer of a rapid fire activator is a Class B
felony.
(b) Unlawful possession of a rapid fire activator is a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) A peace officer, or other person employed by a  law enforcement agency, who pos-
sesses a  rapid fire activator in accordance with authorization given to the peace officer or
other person by the law enforcement agency.
(b) A person who has registered a machine gun in accordance  with federal law and the
rapid fire activator is possessed for use only in, and is necessary for the proper  function of,
the lawfully registered machine gun.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Binary trigger system” means a device that, when built into, installed in  or attached
to a firearm, allows  the firearm to fire both when the trigger is pulled or depressed and when
the trigger is released.
Enrolled Senate Bill 243 (SB 243-C) Page 1
(b) “Bump stock” means a device that, when built into, installed  in or attached to a
firearm, increases the rate of fire of the firearm  by using energy from the recoil of the
firearm to generate a reciprocating action that facilitates repeated activation  of the trigger.
(c) “Burst  trigger system” means a device that, when built into, installed in or attached
to a  firearm, allows the firearm to discharge two or more rounds with a single pull or de-
pression of the trigger by altering the trigger reset.
(d) “Firearm” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
(e) “Forced reset trigger” means a device that, when built into, installed in or attached
to a firearm, mechanically forces the trigger to reset into a firing position after each  round
is fired.
(f) “Hellfire trigger” means a device that, when built into, installed in or  attached to a
firearm, disengages the trigger return spring when the trigger is pulled or depressed.
(g) “Machine gun” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
(h) “Peace officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 133.005.
(i)(A) “Rapid fire activator” means any device, including  a removable manual or power-
driven device, part or combination of parts, constructed  so that, when built into, installed
on or attached to a firearm:
(i) The rate at which the trigger is activated increases  to a faster rate than is possible
for the firearm without the device; or
(ii) The rate of fire increases to a faster rate than is possible for  a person to fire the
firearm without the device.
(B) “Rapid fire activator” includes, but is not limited to, a bump  stock, forced reset
trigger, trigger crank, hellfire trigger, binary trigger system, burst trigger  system, switch,
auto sear or a copy or similar device, regardless of the producer or manufacturer.
(j) “Switch” or “auto sear” means a device that, when  built into, installed in or attached
to a firearm, applies  force to a firearm’s trigger bar to prevent the bar from limiting the
weapon to firing only one round each time the trigger is pulled or depressed.
(k) “Trigger crank” means a device that, when  built into, installed in or attached to a
firearm, repeatedly activates the trigger of the firearm through the use  of a crank, level or
any other part that is turned in a circular motion.
PUBLIC AREA RESTRICTIONS
SECTION 3.
 ORS 166.370 is amended to read:
166.370. (1)(a) Any person who intentionally possesses a  loaded or unloaded firearm or any other
instrument used as a dangerous weapon, while in or on a public  building, shall upon conviction be
guilty of a Class C felony.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  in a prosecution under this section for the
possession of a firearm within the Capitol, within the passenger terminal of a commercial  service
airport with over one million passenger  boardings per year , within a building subject to a policy
described in  ORS 166.377 (3)  or on school grounds subject to a policy  described in ORS 166.377
(1), if the person proves by a preponderance of the evidence that, at  the time of the possession, the
person was licensed under  ORS 166.291 and 166.292 to carry a concealed handgun, upon conviction
the person is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a  person who inten-
tionally possesses:
(A) A firearm in a court facility  is guilty, upon conviction, of a Class C felony. A person who
intentionally possesses a firearm in a court facility shall surrender  the firearm to a law enforcement
officer.
(B) A weapon, other than a firearm, in a court facility may be required  to surrender the weapon
to a law enforcement officer or to  immediately remove it from the court facility. A person who fails
to comply with this subparagraph is guilty, upon conviction, of a Class C felony.
Enrolled Senate Bill 243 (SB 243-C) Page 2
(C) A firearm in a local court facility is guilty, upon conviction, of a Class C felony if, prior  to
the offense, the presiding judge of  the local court facility entered an order prohibiting firearms in
the area in which the court conducts business and during the hours in which the court operates.
(b) The presiding  judge of a judicial district or a municipal court may enter an order permitting
the possession of specified weapons in a court facility.
(c) Within a shared court facility, the presiding judge of a  municipal court or justice of the
peace district may  not enter an order concerning the possession of weapons in the court facility that
is in conflict with an order entered by the presiding judge of the circuit court.
(3) Subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A police officer or reserve officer, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355.
(b) A parole and probation  officer, as defined in ORS 181A.355, while the parole and probation
officer is acting within the scope of employment.
(c) A federal officer, as defined in ORS 133.005, or a certified reserve  officer or corrections of-
ficer, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355, while the federal  officer, certified reserve officer
or corrections officer is acting within the scope of employment.
(d) A person summoned by an officer described in paragraph (a), (b) or  (c) of this subsection to
assist in making an arrest  or preserving the peace, while the summoned person is engaged in as-
sisting the officer.
(e) An honorably retired law enforcement officer.
(f) An active or reserve member  of the military forces of this state or the United States, when
engaged in the performance of duty.
(g) A person who is licensed under ORS 166.291  and 166.292 to carry a concealed handgun, ex-
cept as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(h) A person who is authorized by the officer or  agency that controls the public building to
possess a firearm or dangerous weapon in that public building.
(i) An employee of the United  States Department of Agriculture, acting within the scope of
employment, who possesses a firearm in the course of the lawful taking of wildlife.
(j) Possession of a firearm on school property if the firearm:
(A) Is possessed by a person who is not otherwise prohibited from possessing the firearm; and
(B) Is unloaded and locked in a motor vehicle.
(k) A person  who possesses a firearm in the passenger terminal of a commercial service airport,
if the firearm is unloaded and in a locked hard-sided container for the purposes of transporting  the
firearm as checked baggage in accordance with federal law.
(4)(a) Except as provided in subsection  (1)(b) of this section, the exceptions listed in subsection
(3)(d) to (k) of  this section constitute affirmative defenses to a charge of violating subsection (1)(a)
of this section.
(b) A person may not use the affirmative defense described in subsection (3)(e) of this  section
if the person has been convicted of an  offense that would make the person ineligible to obtain a
concealed handgun license under ORS 166.291 and 166.292.
(5)(a) Any person who knowingly, or  with reckless disregard for the safety of another, dis-
charges or attempts to discharge a firearm at a place that the person knows is a school shall upon
conviction be guilty of a Class C felony.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to the discharge of a firearm:
(A) As part of a program approved by  a school in the school by an individual who is partic-
ipating in the program;
(B) By a law enforcement officer acting in the officer’s official capacity; or
(C) By an employee of  the United States Department of Agriculture, acting within the scope of
employment, in the course of the lawful taking of wildlife.
(6) Any  weapon carried in violation of this section is subject to the forfeiture provisions of ORS
166.279.
Enrolled Senate Bill 243 (SB 243-C) Page 3
(7) Notwithstanding the fact that a person’s conduct in a single  criminal episode constitutes a
violation of both subsections (1) and (5) of this section, the district attorney may  charge the person
with only one of the offenses.
(8) As used in this  section, “dangerous weapon” means a dangerous weapon as that term is de-
fined in ORS 161.015.
SECTION 4.  ORS 166.377 is amended to read:
166.377. (1) The governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002, the Oregon  Health
and Science University Board of Directors, the governing board of a community  college or a district
school  board  as defined in ORS 332.002 may adopt a policy providing that the affirmative defense
described in ORS 166.370 (3)(g), concerning persons licensed to carry a  concealed handgun under
ORS 166.291 and 166.292, does not apply  to the possession of firearms on the grounds of the schools
controlled by the board.
(2) A board that adopts a policy under subsection (1) of  this section shall:
(a) Post a clearly visible sign, at  all normal points of entry to the school grounds subject to the
policy described in subsection (1) of this section, indicating that the affirmative defense described
in ORS 166.370 (3)(g) does not apply.
(b) Post a notice on the board’s  website identifying all school grounds subject to the policy de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The governing body of a  city, a county or a district as defined in ORS 198.010 may
adopt a  policy, ordinance or regulation providing that the affirmative defense described in
ORS 166.370 (3)(g), concerning persons  licensed to carry a concealed handgun under ORS
166.291 and 166.292, does not apply to the possession of firearms within a building owned or
controlled by the governing body that is used by the governing body for official meetings.
(4) A governing body that adopts a policy under subsection (3) of this section shall:
(a) Post a clearly visible sign, at all normal points of entry to  the buildings subject to the
policy described in subsection (3) of this section, indicating that the affirmative defense de-
scribed in ORS 166.370 (3)(g) does not apply.
(b) Post a notice on the governing body’s website identifying all buildings subject  to the
policy described in subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 166.262 is amended to read:
166.262. A peace officer may not arrest or charge  a person for violating ORS 166.250 (1)(a) or
(b) or 166.370 (1)(a) if the person has in the person’s immediate possession:
(1) A valid license to carry a  firearm as provided in ORS 166.291 and 166.292, unless the person
possesses a firearm within the Capitol, within the passenger  terminal of a commercial service air-
port with over one million passenger boardings per year , within a building subject to a  policy
described in ORS 166.377  (3)  or on school grounds subject to a policy described in ORS 166.377
(1);
(2) Proof that the person is a law enforcement officer; or
(3) Proof that the person is an honorably retired law enforcement  officer, unless the person has
been convicted of an offense that would make the person ineligible to obtain a concealed handgun
license under ORS 166.291 and 166.292.
BALLOT MEASURE 114 (2022) APPLICATION
SECTION 6.
 Section 10, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 10. ORS 166.503, 166.505 and 166.508 and the amendments to ORS 166.412, 166.435, 166.436
and 166.438 by sections [ 3] 6 to 9 , [of this 2022 Act ] chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2023,  apply  to firearm
transfers conducted on or after [ the effective date of this 2022 Act ] March 15, 2026 .
SECTION 7.  Section 13, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  The provisions of [ this 2022 Act ] ORS 166.355 apply to [ all actions taken on or after the
effective date of this 2022 Act, unless expressly stated otherwise herein. This  2022 Act may be known
and cited as the Reduction of Gun Violence Act ] the manufacture, importation, possession, use,
Enrolled Senate Bill 243 (SB 243-C) Page 4
purchase, sale or transfer of a large-capacity magazine occurring on or after March 15,
2026.
OPERATIVE DATES
SECTION 8. Sections 1 and 2  of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 166.262, 166.370
and 166.377 by sections 3 to 5 of  this 2025 Act become operative on the 91st day after the date
on which the 2025 regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 9. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the  reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 10. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate May 29, 2025
Repassed by Senate June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 243 (SB 243-C) Page 5